Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.245.010 and 2023 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Adult" means an individual who is 18 years of age or older.(2) "Attending qualified medical provider" means the qualified medical provider who has primary responsibility for the care of the patient and treatment of the patient's terminal disease.(3) "Competent" means that, in the opinion of a court or in the opinion of the patient's attending qualified medical provider, consulting qualified medical provider, psychiatrist, or psychologist, a patient has the ability to make and communicate an informed decision to health care providers, including communication through persons familiar with the patient's manner of communicating if those persons are available.(4) "Consulting qualified medical provider" means a qualified medical provider who is qualified by specialty or experience to make a professional diagnosis and prognosis regarding the patient's disease.(5) "Counseling" means one or more consultations as necessary between a state licensed psychiatrist, psychologist, independent clinical social worker, advanced social worker, mental health counselor, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)) and a patient for the purpose of determining that the patient is competent and not suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression causing impaired judgment.(6) "Health care provider" means a person licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to administer health care or dispense medication in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession, and includes a health care facility.(7) "Informed decision" means a decision by a qualified patient, to request and obtain a prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner, that is based on an appreciation of the relevant facts and after being fully informed by the attending qualified medical provider of:(a) His or her medical diagnosis;(b) His or her prognosis;(c) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed;(d) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and(e) The feasible alternatives including, but not limited to, comfort care, hospice care, and pain control.(8) "Irremediable pain or suffering" means pain or other physical symptoms related to a patient's terminal disease that cannot be reasonably managed or significantly alleviated by available treatment.(9) "Medically confirmed" means the medical opinion of the attending qualified medical provider has been confirmed by a consulting qualified medical provider who has examined the patient and the patient's relevant medical records.(((9)))(10) "Patient" means a person who is under the care of an attending qualified medical provider.(((10)))(11) "Qualified medical provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)) licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.(((11)))(12) "Qualified patient" means a competent adult who is a resident of Washington state and has satisfied the requirements of this chapter in order to obtain a prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner.(((12)))(13) "Self-administer" means a qualified patient's act of ingesting medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner.(((13)))(14) "Terminal disease" means an incurable and irreversible disease that has been medically confirmed and will, within reasonable medical judgment, produce death within six months.Sec. 2. RCW 70.245.090 and 2023 c 38 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) To receive a prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner, a qualified patient shall have made an oral request and a written request, and reiterate the oral request to his or her attending qualified medical provider at least seven days after making the initial oral request.(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if, at the time of the qualified patient's initial oral request in subsection (1) of this section, the attending qualified medical provider determines that the qualified patient: (a) Is not expected to survive for seven days; (b) is not expected to retain the ability to self-administer the life-ending mediation for seven days; or (c) is experiencing irremediable pain or suffering, then the qualified patient is exempt from the seven day waiting period between the first and second oral requests for medication.(3) At the time the qualified patient makes his or her second oral request, the attending qualified medical provider shall offer the qualified patient an opportunity to rescind the request.(((3)))(4) A transfer of care or medical records does not restart any waiting period under this section.Sec. 3. RCW 70.245.230 and 2023 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the provisions in subsection (2) of this section, a qualified patient may select the attending or consulting qualified medical provider of the qualified patient's choosing.(2)(a) If a qualified patient selects an attending qualified medical provider who is a licensed professional other than a physician, the qualified patient must select a physician to serve as the qualified patient's consulting qualified medical provider.(b) A qualified patient may select a consulting qualified medical provider who is a licensed professional other than a physician, only if the qualified patient's attending qualified medical provider is a physician.(c) ((The))If the attending qualified medical provider ((and))or the consulting qualified medical provider selected by the qualified patient is a physician assistant, the other qualified medical provider may not have a direct supervisory relationship with ((each other))the physician assistant who is serving as the attending qualified medical provider or the consulting qualified medical provider.--- END ---